Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4204
Audiovisual communication system
and facilities; requirements.

The audiovisual communication
system and the facilities for an audiovisual court appearance shall:

(1) Operate so that the detainee or prisoner and the judge or magistrate
can see each other simultaneously and converse with each other verbally and
documents can be transmitted between the judge or magistrate and the detainee
or prisoner;

(2) Operate so that the detainee or prisoner and his or her counsel,
if any, are both physically in the same location during the audiovisual court
appearance; or if the
detainee or prisoner and his or her counsel are in different locations, operate
so that the detainee or prisoner and counsel can communicate privately and
confidentially and be allowed to confidentially transmit papers back and forth;
and

(3) Be at locations conducive to judicial proceedings. Audiovisual court
proceedings may be conducted in the courtroom, the judge's or magistrate's
chambers, or any other location suitable for audiovisual communications. The
locations shall be sufficiently lighted for use of the audiovisual equipment.
The location provided for the judge or magistrate to preside shall be accessible
to the public and shall be operated so that interested persons have an opportunity
to observe the proceeding.

Laws 1999, LB 623, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 23;

Laws 2009, LB90, § 1.